Utah statutes.
16-10a-1433.   Decree of dissolution.

(1)  If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in Section 16-10a-1430 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution.  The clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the division for filing.

(2)  After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation's business and affairs in accordance with Section 16-10a-1405 and the giving of notice to its registered agent, or to the division if it has no registered agent, and to claimants in accordance with Sections 16-10a-1406 and 16-10a-1407.

(3)  The court's order may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

